Washington statutes.
RCW 26.14.030

Applicable law.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the law applicable to arbitration is chapter 7.04A RCW.

(2) In determining the merits of a family law dispute, an arbitrator shall apply the law of this state, including its choice of law rules.

[ 2023 c 61 s 4.]